fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Stockage des aliments: Boîtes à pain; Seaux à confiseries; Boîtes à biscuits; Couvercles pour récipients alimentaires; Sacs de stockage des aliments; Conteneurs de stockage des aliments; Emballages alimentaires; Pots à miel
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Dispenser per cibo: Contenitori per pane; Secchielli per caramelle; Biscottiere; Coperchi per contenitori alimentari; Borse conservazione cibo; Contenitori per cibo; Imballaggi per alimenti; Barattoli di miele
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 식품 보관: 빵 상자/봉투; 사탕 바구니; 쿠키통; 식품 용기 뚜껑; 식품 보관 백; 식품 보관 용기; 식품용 랩; 꿀단지
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Съхранение на храна: Кутии и чанти за хляб; Кофички за бонбони; Буркани за бисквитки; Капаци за контейнери за храна; Чанти за съхранение на храна; Контейнери за съхранение на храна; Хранителни опаковки; Буркани за мед
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Yiyecek Saklama: Ekmek Kutuları ve Torbaları; Şeker Kaseleri; Kurabiye Kavanozları; Yiyecek Kabı Kapakları; Yiyecek Saklama Poşetleri; Yiyecek Saklama Kapları; Yiyecek Ambalajları; Bal Kavanozları
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Shranjevanje živil: Posode in vrečke za kruh; Vedra za sladkarije; Kozarci za piškote; Pokrovi za posode z živili; Vrečke za shranjevanje živil; Posode za shranjevanje živil; Folije za živila; Kozarci za med
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Αποθήκευση Τροφίμων: Κουτιά & σακούλες ψωμιού; Καλάθι με γλυκά; Βαζάκια για μπισκότα; Καλύμματα δοχείων τροφίμων; Τσάντες αποθήκευσης τροφίμων; Δοχεία αποθήκευσης τροφίμων; Περιτυλίγματα τροφίμων; Βαζάκια με μέλι
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Ruuan säilytys: Leipälaatikot ja -pussit; Karkkipurkit; Keksipurkit; Ruoka-astioiden kannet; Ruuan säilytyspussit; Ruuan säilytysastiat; Elintarvikekääreet; Hunajapurkit
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Хранение еды и продуктов: Хлебницы и мешки для хлеба; Ведерки для конфет; Банки для печенья; Крышки контейнеров для пищевых продуктов; Пакеты для пищевых продуктов; Контейнеры для пищевых продуктов; Пищевая пленка, фольга и бумага; Банки для меда
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Armazenamento de alimentos: Caixas e sacos para pão; Baldes para doces; Frascos para bolachas; Tampas para recipientes de alimentos; Sacos para armazenamento de alimentos; Recipientes para armazenamento de alimentos; Invólucros para alimentos; Frascos para mel
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 食物儲藏: 麵包盒/袋; 糖果桶; 餅乾罐; 食物容器蓋; 食物保鮮袋; 食物保存容器; 食物包裝紙; 蜂蜜罐
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Food Storage: Bread Boxes & Bags; Candy Buckets; Cookie Jars; Food Container Covers; Food Storage Bags; Food Storage Containers; Food Wraps; Honey Jars
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Madopbevaring: Brødkasser og -poser; Slikspande; Kagedåser; Låg til skåle; Madopbevaring – tasker; Madopbevaring – beholdere; Indpakning til fødevarer; Honningkrukker
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Skladování potravin: Chlebníky; Dózy na bonbóny; Dózy na sušenky; Víka na nádoby; Pytlíky na potraviny; Boxy na potraviny; Obaly na potraviny; Nádoby na med
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Essensaufbewahrung: Brotkästen & -taschen; Nascheimer; Kecksdosen & -behälter; Lebensmittel-Abdeckhauben; Frischhaltebeutel; Lebensmittelbehälter; Lebensmittelverpackungsmaterial; Honiggläser
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dự trữ thực phẩm: Hộp & túi đựng bánh mì; Giỏ đựng kẹo; Hũ/ lọ bánh quy; Nắp đậy đồ chứa thực phẩm; Túi bảo quản thực phẩm; Đồ đựng thực phẩm; Giấy gói thực phẩm; Lọ mật ong
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > ที่เก็บอาหาร: กล่องและถุงใส่ขนมปัง; ถังใส่ลูกอม; ขวดโหลคุกกี้; ฝาปิดภาชนะบรรจุอาหาร; ถุงที่เก็บอาหาร; ภาชนะจัดเก็บอาหาร; อุปกรณ์ห่ออาหาร; โถแก้วสำหรับน้ำผึ้ง
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Voedsel bewaren: Broodtrommels; Snoeppotten; Koekjestrommels; Deksels voor voedseldozen; Zakken voor voedselopslag; Containers voor voedselopslag; Plastic zakjes; Honingkruiken
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > 食品保存: ブレッドケース・パンケース; 飴入れ; クッキージャー; フードコンテナ・ボウル用フタ; 食品保存袋; 食品保存容器; 食品包装; はちみつ容器
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Przechowywanie żywności: Pojemniki i torby na chleb; Słoje na cukierki; Słoje na ciastka; Pokrywki do pojemników na żywność; Torebki do przechowywania żywności; Pojemniki do przechowywania żywności; Zawijanie żywności; Słoiki na miód
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Recipiente para comida: Paneras; Cubos de caramelos; Botes de galletas; Tapas para tuppers; Bolsas de comida; Envases para comida; Envoltorios de comida; Tarros de miel
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Élelmiszer-tárolás: Kenyérdobozok és -táskák; Cukorkavödrök; Sütisüvegek; Élelmiszertároló-fedelek; Élelmiszertároló táskák; Élelmiszertároló konténerek; Élelmiszer-csomagolások; Mézesüvegek
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Armazenamento de alimentos: Caixas e sacos de pão; Baldes de doces; Biscoteira; Tapas de recipientes para alimentos; Sacos para armazenamento de alimentos; Recipientes para armazenamento de alimentos; Embalagens para alimentos; Jarras para mel
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 食品贮存: 面包盒/面包袋; 糖果桶; 饼干罐; 食品容器盖子; 食品保鲜袋; 食品贮存容器; 食品包装纸; 蜜罐
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Matförvaring: Brödlådor och brödpåsar; Godishinkar; Kakburkar; Skållock; Matförvaringspåsar; Behållare för matförvaring; Matfolie; Honungsburkar
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Maisto saugojimas: Duonos dėžutės ir maišeliai; Indai saldainiams; Sausainių stiklainiai; Maisto konteinerių dangteliai; Maišeliai maistui laikyti; Ėdalo saugojimo konteineriai; Maisto vyniojimo priemonės; Medaus stiklainiai
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Skladovanie potravín: Chlebníky a vrecká na chlieb; Dózy na cukríky; Dózy na sušienky; Viečka na nádoby na potraviny; Vrecká na skladovanie potravín; Nádoby na potraviny; Potravinové fólie; Dózy na med
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Skladištenje hrane: Kutije i vrećice za kruh; Kantice za slatkiše; Staklenke za kolačiće; Poklopci spremnika za hranu; Vrećice za skladištenje hrane; Spremnici za skladištenje hrane; Omoti za hranu; Staklenke za med
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Matlagring: Brødbokser og -poser; Godterispann; Kakebokser; Trekk til matbeholdere; Matlagringsposer; Beholdere for matoppbevaring; Trekk til mat; Honningkrukker
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Depozitarea alimentelor: Cutii și pungi pentru pâine; Cutii pentru bomboane; Borcane pentru fursecuri; Capace pentru recipiente pentru alimente; Pungi pentru depozitarea alimentelor; Recipiente pentru depozitarea alimentelor; Ambalaje pentru alimente; Borcane pentru miere